Florida, session 2026, SB312.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âPresent subsections (15) through (22) of section 30 765.101, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (16) 31 through (23), respectively, a new subsection (15) is added to 32 that section, and subsections (1) and (7) of that section are 33 amended, to read: 34 765.101âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 35 (1)ââAdvance directiveâ means a witnessed written document 36 or oral statement in which instructions are given by a principal 37 or in which the principalâs desires are expressed concerning any 38 aspect of the principalâs health care or health information, and 39 includes, but is not limited to, the designation of a health 40 care surrogate, a living will, or an anatomical gift made 41 pursuant to part V of this chapter. An advance directive may 42 also include a patient-directed medical order. 43 (7)ââHealth care facilityâ means a hospital, nursing home, 44 hospice, home health agency, or health maintenance organization 45 licensed in this state; a, or any facility subject to part I of 46 chapter 394; or an assisted living facility or adult family-care 47 home licensed under chapter 429. 48 (15)ââPatient-directed medical orderâ means a medical order 49 created by the principal in collaboration with a physician, a 50 physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse 51 registered under s. 464.0123 which is portable across health 52 care settings and accessible in a voluntary online registry. 53 Section 2.âSubsection (6) of section 765.102, Florida 54 Statutes, is amended to read: 55 765.102âLegislative findings and intent.â 56 (6)âFor purposes of this chapter: 57 (a)âPalliative care is the comprehensive management of the 58 physical, psychological, social, spiritual, and existential 59 needs of patients. Palliative care is especially suited to the 60 care of persons who have incurable or, progressive illnesses. 61 (b)âPalliative care may must include: 62 1.âAn opportunity to discuss and plan for end-of-life care. 63 2.âAssurance that physical and mental suffering will be 64 carefully attended to. 65 3.âAssurance that preferences for withholding and 66 withdrawing life-sustaining interventions will be honored. 67 4.âAssurance that the personal goals of the dying person 68 will be addressed. 69 5.âAssurance that the dignity of the dying person will be a 70 priority. 71 6.âAssurance that health care providers will not abandon 72 the dying person. 73 7.âAssurance that the burden to family and others will be 74 addressed. 75 8.âAssurance that advance directives for care, orders not 76 to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45, and patient 77 directed medical orders executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 will be 78 respected regardless of the location of care. 79 9.âAssurance that organizational mechanisms are in place to 80 evaluate the availability and quality of end-of-life, 81 palliative, and hospice care services, including the evaluation 82 of administrative and regulatory barriers. 83 10.âAssurance that necessary health care services will be 84 provided and that relevant reimbursement policies are available. 85 11.âAssurance that the goals expressed in subparagraphs 1. 86 10. will be accomplished in a culturally appropriate manner. 87 Section 3.âSection 765.3041, Florida Statutes, is created 88 to read: 89 765.3041âPatient-directed medical orders.â 90 (1)âTo facilitate a principalâs instructions concerning 91 treatment preferences, a patient-directed medical order may be 92 executed in advance to direct the actions of health care 93 providers and health care facilities. 94 (2)âA valid patient-directed medical order must: 95 (a)âBe on a form adopted by rule of the Department of 96 Health and may be combined with an order not to resuscitate 97 executed pursuant to s. 401.45. The form must: 98 1.âAddress medical interventions to be withheld or 99 withdrawn when the application of life-prolonging procedures 100 would serve only to prolong artificially the process of dying. 101 2.âBe signed by the principal and the principalâs 102 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered 103 nurse registered under s. 464.0123. 104 a.âIf the principal is physically unable to sign the form, 105 the physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 106 registered nurse present at the discussion as required by 107 subparagraph (b)1. may subscribe the principalâs signature in 108 the principalâs presence and at the principalâs direction. If 109 telehealth is used, the physician, physician assistant, or 110 advanced practice registered nurse may be present at either 111 location where telehealth is being administered. 112 b.âIf the principal is incapacitated, the form may be 113 signed by the principalâs health care surrogate or proxy, court 114 appointed guardian as provided in chapter 744, or attorney in 115 fact under a durable power of attorney as provided in chapter 116 709. The court-appointed guardian or attorney in fact must be 117 delegated authority to make health care decisions on behalf of 118 the principal. 119 c.âAll signatures may be electronic signatures. 120 (b)âClearly express the principalâs preferences and 121 instructions for care, which may include all treatments 122 available, modified treatments that are not prolonged or 123 burdensome, or comfort measures that do not pursue or continue 124 interventions. 125 1.âThe principal and a physician, a physician assistant, or 126 an advanced practice registered nurse registered under s. 127 464.0123 must discuss the principalâs medical treatment wishes 128 relating to medical interventions to be withheld or withdrawn 129 based on the principalâs values and preferences in the event the 130 principal becomes unable to make her or his own decisions. 131 2.âThe discussion must be in person and may be conducted 132 using telehealth. 133 (3)âRegardless of the decision to withhold or withdraw 134 life-prolonging procedures, necessary health care services must 135 be provided for the care and comfort of the principal or to 136 alleviate pain. 137 (4)âA physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced 138 practice registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 may 139 withhold or withdraw cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other 140 life-prolonging procedures if presented with an order not to 141 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed 142 medical order executed pursuant to this section which contains 143 an order not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw 144 life-prolonging procedures. A physician, a physician assistant, 145 or an advanced practice registered nurse registered under s. 146 464.0123 is not subject to any disciplinary action under s. 147 456.072 or criminal prosecution or civil liability, or 148 considered to have engaged in negligent or unprofessional 149 conduct, for withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary 150 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to 151 such orders. The absence of an order not to resuscitate executed 152 pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical order 153 executed pursuant to this section does not preclude a physician, 154 a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse 155 registered under s. 464.0123 from withholding or withdrawing 156 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging 157 procedures as otherwise authorized by law. 158 Section 4.âParagraph (l) of subsection (3) of section 159 395.1041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 160 395.1041âAccess to and ensurance of emergency services; 161 transfers; patient rights; diversion programs; reports of 162 controlled substance overdoses.â 163 (3)âEMERGENCY SERVICES; DISCRIMINATION; LIABILITY OF 164 FACILITY OR HEALTH CARE PERSONNEL.â 165 (l)âHospital personnel may withhold or withdraw 166 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging 167 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate 168 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical 169 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order 170 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life 171 prolonging procedures. Facility staff and facilities are shall 172 not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability, or 173 nor be considered to have engaged in negligent or unprofessional 174 conduct, for withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary 175 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to 176 such orders an order. The absence of an order not to resuscitate 177 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical 178 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 does not preclude a 179 physician from withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary 180 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures as otherwise 181 authorized permitted by law. 182 Section 5.âSubsection (3) of section 400.142, Florida 183 Statutes, is amended to read: 184 400.142âEmergency medication kits; orders not to 185 resuscitate and patient-directed medical orders.â 186 (3)âFacility staff may withhold or withdraw cardiopulmonary 187 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures if presented 188 with an order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 189 or a patient-directed medical order executed pursuant to s. 190 765.3041 which contains an order not to resuscitate or an order 191 to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures. Facility 192 staff and facilities are not subject to criminal prosecution or 193 civil liability, or considered to have engaged in negligent or 194 unprofessional conduct, for withholding or withdrawing 195 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging 196 procedures pursuant to such orders order. The absence of an 197 order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a 198 patient-directed medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 199 does not preclude a physician from withholding or withdrawing 200 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging 201 procedures as otherwise authorized permitted by law. 202 Section 6.âSubsection (7) of section 400.487, Florida 203 Statutes, is amended to read: 204 400.487âHome health service agreements; physicianâs, 205 physician assistantâs, and advanced practice registered nurseâs 206 treatment orders; patient assessment; establishment and review 207 of plan of care; provision of services; orders not to 208 resuscitate and patient-directed medical orders.â 209 (7)âHome health agency personnel may withhold or withdraw 210 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging 211 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate 212 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical 213 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order 214 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life 215 prolonging procedures. The agency shall adopt rules providing 216 for the implementation of such orders. Home health personnel and 217 agencies are shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or 218 civil liability, or nor be considered to have engaged in 219 negligent or unprofessional conduct, for withholding or 220 withdrawing cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life 221 prolonging procedures pursuant to such orders an order and rules 222 adopted by the agency. The absence of an order not to 223 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed 224 medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 does not preclude 225 a physician from withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary 226 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures as otherwise 227 authorized by law. 228 Section 7.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 229 400.605, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 230 400.605âAdministration; forms; fees; rules; inspections; 231 fines.â 232 (1)âThe agency shall by rule establish minimum standards 233 and procedures for a hospice pursuant to this part. The rules 234 must include: 235 (e)âProcedures relating to the implementation of advance 236 advanced directives, patient-directed medical orders executed 237 pursuant to s. 765.3041, and do-not-resuscitate orders not to 238 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45. 239 Section 8.âSubsection (8) of section 400.6095, Florida 240 Statutes, is amended to read: 241 400.6095âPatient admission; assessment; plan of care; 242 discharge; death.â 243 (8)âThe hospice care team may withhold or withdraw 244 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging 245 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate 246 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical 247 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order 248 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life 249 prolonging procedures. The agency shall adopt rules providing 250 for the implementation of such orders. Hospice staff are shall 251 not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability, or 252 nor be considered to have engaged in negligent or unprofessional 253 conduct, for withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary 254 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to 255 such orders an order and applicable rules. The absence of an 256 order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a 257 patient-directed medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 258 does not preclude a physician from withholding or withdrawing 259 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging 260 procedures as otherwise authorized permitted by law. 261 Section 9.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 262 400.611, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 263 400.611âInterdisciplinary records of care; confidentiality; 264 release of records.â 265 (4)âA hospice may not release a patientâs interdisciplinary 266 record or any portion thereof, unless the person requesting the 267 information provides to the hospice: 268 (b)âIn the case of an incapacitated patient, a patient 269 authorization executed before prior to the patientâs death by 270 the patientâs then acting legal guardian, health care surrogate 271 as defined in s. 765.101 s. 765.101(21), health care proxy as 272 defined in s. 765.101 s. 765.101(19), or agent under power of 273 attorney; 274 Section 10.âSubsection (4) of section 401.35, Florida 275 Statutes, is amended to read: 276 401.35âRules.âThe department shall adopt rules, including 277 definitions of terms, necessary to carry out the purposes of 278 this part. 279 (4)âThe rules must establish circumstances and procedures 280 under which emergency medical technicians and paramedics may 281 honor orders not to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 282 or patient-directed medical orders executed pursuant to s. 283 765.3041 which contain an order not to resuscitate or an order 284 to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures by the 285 patientâs physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 286 registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 not to resuscitate 287 and the documentation and reporting requirements for handling 288 such orders requests. 289 Section 11.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (3) of 290 section 401.45, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 291 401.45âDenial of emergency treatment; civil liability.â 292 (3)(a)âResuscitation may be withheld or withdrawn from a 293 patient by An emergency medical technician or paramedic may 294 withhold or withdraw cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other 295 life-prolonging procedures if presented with evidence of an 296 order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to this subsection or 297 a patient-directed medical order executed pursuant to s. 298 765.3041 which contains an order not to resuscitate or an order 299 to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures by the 300 patientâs physician or physician assistant is presented to the 301 emergency medical technician or paramedic. An order not to 302 resuscitate executed pursuant to this subsection or a patient 303 directed medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which 304 contains an order not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or 305 withdraw life-prolonging procedures, to be valid, must be on the 306 form adopted by rule of the department. The form must be signed 307 by the patientâs physician, or physician assistant, or advanced 308 practice registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 and by 309 the patient or, if the patient is incapacitated, the patientâs 310 health care surrogate or proxy as provided in chapter 765, 311 court-appointed guardian as provided in chapter 744, or attorney 312 in fact under a durable power of attorney as provided in chapter 313 709. The court-appointed guardian or attorney in fact must have 314 been delegated authority to make health care decisions on behalf 315 of the patient. 316 (b)âAny licensee, physician, medical director, or emergency 317 medical technician or paramedic who acts under the direction of 318 a medical director is not subject to criminal prosecution or 319 civil liability, and has not engaged in negligent or 320 unprofessional conduct, as a result of the withholding or 321 withdrawal of cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life 322 prolonging procedures from a patient pursuant to this subsection 323 and rules adopted by the department. 324 Section 12.âSubsection (4) of section 429.255, Florida 325 Statutes, is amended to read: 326 429.255âUse of personnel; emergency care.â 327 (4)âFacility staff may withhold or withdraw cardiopulmonary 328 resuscitation, or the use of an automated external 329 defibrillator, or other life-prolonging procedures if presented 330 with an order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 331 or a patient-directed medical order executed pursuant to s. 332 765.3041 which contains an order not to resuscitate or an order 333 to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures. The agency 334 shall adopt rules providing for the implementation of such 335 orders. Facility staff and facilities are may not be subject to 336 criminal prosecution or civil liability, or nor be considered to 337 have engaged in negligent or unprofessional conduct, for 338 withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary resuscitation, the or 339 use of an automated external defibrillator, or other life 340 prolonging procedures pursuant to such orders an order and rules 341 adopted by the agency. The absence of an order not to 342 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed 343 medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 does not preclude 344 a physician from withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary 345 resuscitation, the or use of an automated external 346 defibrillator, or other life-prolonging procedures as otherwise 347 authorized permitted by law. 348 Section 13.âSubsection (3) of section 429.73, Florida 349 Statutes, is amended to read: 350 429.73âRules and standards relating to adult family-care 351 homes.â 352 (3)âThe agency shall adopt rules providing for the 353 implementation of orders not to resuscitate and patient-directed 354 medical orders. The provider may withhold or withdraw 355 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging 356 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate 357 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical 358 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order 359 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life 360 prolonging procedures. The provider is shall not be subject to 361 criminal prosecution or civil liability, or nor be considered to 362 have engaged in negligent or unprofessional conduct, for 363 withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary resuscitation or 364 other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to such orders an 365 order and applicable rules. The absence of an order not to 366 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed 367 medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 does not preclude 368 a physician from withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary 369 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures as otherwise 370 authorized by law. 371 Section 14.âSubsections (1), (7), and (8) of section 372 744.4431, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 373 744.4431âGuardianship power regarding life-prolonging 374 procedures.â 375 (1)âExcept as provided in this section, decisions by a 376 professional guardian, as defined in s. 744.102, to withhold or 377 withdraw life-prolonging procedures from, or to execute an order 378 not to resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed 379 medical order pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order 380 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life 381 prolonging procedures for, a ward must be approved by the court. 382 A professional guardian appointed to act on behalf of a wardâs 383 person must petition the court pursuant to the Florida Probate 384 Rules for authority to consent to withhold or withdraw life 385 prolonging procedures or to execute an order not to resuscitate 386 pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical order 387 pursuant to s. 765.3041. Court approval must be obtained before 388 taking such action, except as provided in subsection (7). 389 (7)âCourt approval is not required for the following 390 decisions: 391 (a)âA decision to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging 392 procedures made by a professional guardian to whom authority has 393 been granted by the court under s. 744.3115 to carry out the 394 instructions in or to take actions consistent with the wardâs 395 advance directive, order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to 396 s. 401.45, or patient-directed medical order executed pursuant 397 to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to resuscitate or an 398 order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures, as 399 long as there are no known objections from the ward; the wardâs 400 attorney; the wardâs next of kin, if known; and any other 401 interested persons as the court may direct based on s. 402 765.105(1). 403 (b)âA decision by a professional guardian who has been 404 delegated health care decisionmaking authority to execute an 405 order not to resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient 406 directed medical order pursuant to s. 765.3041, as described in 407 s. 401.45(3)(a), if the ward is in a hospital and the following 408 conditions are met: 409 1.âThe wardâs primary treating physician and at least one 410 other consulting physician document in the wardâs medical record 411 that: 412 a.âThere is no reasonable medical probability for recovery 413 from or a cure of the wardâs underlying medical condition; 414 b.âThe ward is in an end-stage condition, a terminal 415 condition, or a persistent vegetative state as those terms are 416 defined in s. 765.101, and that the wardâs death is imminent; 417 and 418 c.âResuscitation will cause the ward physical harm or 419 additional pain. 420 2.âThe professional guardian has notified the wardâs next 421 of kin, if known, and any interested persons as the court may 422 direct and the decision is not contrary to the wardâs expressed 423 wishes and there are no known objections from the ward; the 424 wardâs attorney; the wardâs next of kin, if known; or any other 425 interested persons as the court may direct on the basis of s. 426 765.105(1). 427 (8)âWithin 2 business days after executing an order not to 428 resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical 429 order pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to 430 resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging 431 procedures under paragraph (7)(b), a professional guardian must 432 notify the court in writing of all of the following: 433 (a)âThe date the order not to resuscitate or patient 434 directed medical order was executed. 435 (b)âThe location of the ward when the order not to 436 resuscitate or patient-directed medical order was executed. 437 (c)âThe names of the physicians who documented the wardâs 438 condition in the wardâs medical record. 439 Section 15.âSubsection (3) of section 752.001, Florida 440 Statutes, is amended to read: 441 752.001âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 442 (3)ââPersistent vegetative stateâ has the same meaning as 443 provided in s. 765.101 s. 765.101(15). 444 Section 16.âSubsections (1) and (4) of section 765.110, 445 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 446 765.110âHealth care facilities and providers; discipline.â 447 (1)âA health care facility, pursuant to Pub. L. No. 101 448 508, ss. 4206 and 4751, shall provide to each patient written 449 information concerning the individualâs rights concerning 450 advance directives, orders not to resuscitate executed pursuant 451 to s. 401.45, or patient-directed medical orders executed 452 pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contain an order not to 453 resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging 454 procedures and the health care facilityâs policies respecting 455 the implementation of such rights, and shall document in the 456 patientâs medical records whether or not the individual has 457 executed an advance directive, an order not to resuscitate 458 pursuant to s. 401.45, or a patient-directed medical order 459 pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to 460 resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging 461 procedures. 462 (4)âThe Department of Health, in consultation with the 463 Department of Elderly Affairs, for health care providers; the 464 Agency for Health Care Administration for hospitals, hospices, 465 nursing homes, home health agencies, assisted living facilities, 466 adult family-care homes, and health maintenance organizations; 467 and the Department of Children and Families for facilities 468 subject to part I of chapter 394 shall adopt rules to implement 469 this section. 470 Section 17.âSubsection (3) of section 765.204, Florida 471 Statutes, is amended to read: 472 765.204âCapacity of principal; procedure.â 473 (3)âThe surrogateâs authority commences either upon a 474 determination under subsection (2) that the principal lacks 475 capacity or upon a stipulation of such authority pursuant to s. 476 765.101 s. 765.101(21). Such authority remains in effect until a 477 determination that the principal has regained such capacity, if 478 the authority commenced as a result of incapacity, or until the 479 authority is revoked, if the authority commenced immediately 480 pursuant to s. 765.101 s. 765.101(21). Upon commencement of the 481 surrogateâs authority, a surrogate who is not the principalâs 482 spouse shall notify the principalâs spouse or adult children of 483 the principalâs designation of the surrogate. Except if the 484 principal provided immediately exercisable authority to the 485 surrogate pursuant to s. 765.101 s. 765.101(21), in the event 486 that the primary or attending physician determines that the 487 principal has regained capacity, the authority of the surrogate 488 shall cease, but recommences if the principal subsequently loses 489 capacity as determined pursuant to this section. A health care 490 provider is not liable for relying upon health care decisions 491 made by a surrogate while the principal lacks capacity. At any 492 time when a principal lacks capacity, a health care decision 493 made on the principalâs behalf by a surrogate is effective to 494 the same extent as a decision made by the principal. If a 495 principal possesses capacity, health care decisions of the 496 principal take precedence over decisions made by the surrogate 497 that present a material conflict. 498 Section 18.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 499 765.205, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 500 765.205âResponsibility of the surrogate.â 501 (1)âThe surrogate, in accordance with the principalâs 502 instructions, unless such authority has been expressly limited 503 by the principal, shall: 504 (c)âProvide written consent using an appropriate form 505 whenever consent is required, including the execution of an a 506 physicianâs order not to resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a 507 patient-directed medical order pursuant to s. 765.3041 which 508 contains an order not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or 509 withdraw life-prolonging procedures. 510 Section 19.âSubsection (2) of section 765.305, Florida 511 Statutes, is amended to read: 512 765.305âProcedure in absence of a living will.â 513 (2)âBefore exercising the incompetent patientâs right to 514 forego treatment, including the execution of an order not to 515 resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical 516 order pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to 517 resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging 518 procedures, the surrogate must be satisfied that: 519 (a)âThe patient does not have a reasonable medical 520 probability of recovering capacity so that the right could be 521 exercised by the patient. 522 (b)âThe patient has an end-stage condition, the patient is 523 in a persistent vegetative state, or the patientâs physical 524 condition is terminal. 525 Section 20.âThe Agency for Health Care Administration shall 526 create and update a database for the storage of patient-directed 527 medical orders, which shall be stored solely at the option of 528 the patient in electronic form by the agency. 529 Section 21.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.